test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NA_VINIT_aagim_gt-norm.yaml
     2+aagim+Dim+Pej+21+Pret+Loc: gidaagimensishinaanibaniing
     2+aagim+Dim+Pej+21+Pret+Obv: gidaagimensishinaanibaniin
     2+aagim+Dim+Pej+21+Pret+Pl: gidaagimensishinaanibaniig
     2+aagim+Dim+Pej+21+VocPl+Loc: [gidaagimensishinaanidig, gidaagimensishinaanidog]
     2+aagim+Dim+Pej+21+VocPl+Obv: [gidaagimensishinaanidig, gidaagimensishinaanidog]
     2+aagim+Dim+Pej+21+VocPl+Pl: [gidaagimensishinaanidig, gidaagimensishinaanidog]
     2+aagim+Dim+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Loc: gidaagimensishiwaabaniing
     2+aagim+Dim+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Obv: gidaagimensishiwaabaniin
     2+aagim+Dim+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Pl: gidaagimensishiwaabaniig
     2+aagim+Dim+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Loc: [gidaagimensishiwaadig, gidaagimensishiwaadog]
     2+aagim+Dim+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Obv: [gidaagimensishiwaadig, gidaagimensishiwaadog]
     2+aagim+Dim+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Pl: [gidaagimensishiwaadig, gidaagimensishiwaadog]
     3+aagim+Con+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Loc: odaagimenyishiniibaniing
     3+aagim+Con+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Obv: odaagimenyishiniibaniin
     3+aagim+Con+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Pl: odaagimenyishiniibaniig
     3+aagim+Con+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Loc: [odaagimenyishiniidig, odaagimenyishiniidog]
     3+aagim+Con+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Obv: [odaagimenyishiniidig, odaagimenyishiniidog]
     3+aagim+Con+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Pl: [odaagimenyishiniidig, odaagimenyishiniidog]
     3+aagim+Con+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Loc: odaagimenyishiwaabaniing
     3+aagim+Con+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Obv: odaagimenyishiwaabaniin
     3+aagim+Con+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Pl: odaagimenyishiwaabaniig
     3+aagim+Con+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Loc: [odaagimenyishiwaadig, odaagimenyishiwaadog]
     3+aagim+Con+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Obv: [odaagimenyishiwaadig, odaagimenyishiwaadog]
     3+aagim+Con+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Pl: [odaagimenyishiwaadig, odaagimenyishiwaadog]
     3+aagim+Dim+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Loc: odaagimensishiniibaniing
     3+aagim+Dim+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Obv: odaagimensishiniibaniin
     3+aagim+Dim+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Pl: odaagimensishiniibaniig
     3+aagim+Dim+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Loc: [odaagimensishiniidig, odaagimensishiniidog]
     3+aagim+Dim+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Obv: [odaagimensishiniidig, odaagimensishiniidog]
     3+aagim+Dim+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Pl: [odaagimensishiniidig, odaagimensishiniidog]
     3+aagim+Dim+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Loc: odaagimensishiwaabaniing
     3+aagim+Dim+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Obv: odaagimensishiwaabaniin
     3+aagim+Dim+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Pl: odaagimensishiwaabaniig
     3+aagim+Dim+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Loc: [odaagimensishiwaadig, odaagimensishiwaadog]
     3+aagim+Dim+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Obv: [odaagimensishiwaadig, odaagimensishiwaadog]
     3+aagim+Dim+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Pl: [odaagimensishiwaadig, odaagimensishiwaadog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7
     1+aagim+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Pret+Loc: nidaagimimishinaanibaniing
     1+aagim+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Pret+Obv: nidaagimimishinaanibaniin
     1+aagim+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Pret+Pl: nidaagimimishinaanibaniig
     1+aagim+Pos+Pej+1Pl+VocPl+Loc: [nidaagimimishinaanidig, nidaagimimishinaanidog]
     1+aagim+Pos+Pej+1Pl+VocPl+Obv: [nidaagimimishinaanidig, nidaagimimishinaanidog]
     1+aagim+Pos+Pej+1Pl+VocPl+Pl: [nidaagimimishinaanidig, nidaagimimishinaanidog]
     2+aagim+Pos+Pej+21+Pret+Loc: gidaagimimishinaanibaniing
     2+aagim+Pos+Pej+21+Pret+Obv: gidaagimimishinaanibaniin
     2+aagim+Pos+Pej+21+Pret+Pl: gidaagimimishinaanibaniig
     2+aagim+Pos+Pej+21+VocPl+Loc: [gidaagimimishinaanidig, gidaagimimishinaanidog]
     2+aagim+Pos+Pej+21+VocPl+Obv: [gidaagimimishinaanidig, gidaagimimishinaanidog]
     2+aagim+Pos+Pej+21+VocPl+Pl: [gidaagimimishinaanidig, gidaagimimishinaanidog]
     2+aagim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Loc: gidaagimimishiwaabaniing
     2+aagim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Obv: gidaagimimishiwaabaniin
     2+aagim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Pl: gidaagimimishiwaabaniig
     2+aagim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Loc: [gidaagimimishiwaadig, gidaagimimishiwaadog]
     2+aagim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Obv: [gidaagimimishiwaadig, gidaagimimishiwaadog]
     2+aagim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Pl: [gidaagimimishiwaadig, gidaagimimishiwaadog]
     3+aagim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Loc: odaagimimishiniibaniing
     3+aagim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Obv: odaagimimishiniibaniin
     3+aagim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Pl: odaagimimishiniibaniig
     3+aagim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Loc: [odaagimimishiniidig, odaagimimishiniidog]
     3+aagim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Obv: [odaagimimishiniidig, odaagimimishiniidog]
     3+aagim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Pl: [odaagimimishiniidig, odaagimimishiniidog]
     3+aagim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Loc: odaagimimishiwaabaniing
     3+aagim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Obv: odaagimimishiwaabaniin
     3+aagim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Pl: odaagimimishiwaabaniig
     3+aagim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Loc: [odaagimimishiwaadig, odaagimimishiwaadog]
     3+aagim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Obv: [odaagimimishiwaadig, odaagimimishiwaadog]
     3+aagim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Pl: [odaagimimishiwaadig, odaagimimishiwaadog]
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7
     1+aagim+Con+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Pret+Loc: nidaagimenyimishinaanibaniing
     1+aagim+Con+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Pret+Obv: nidaagimenyimishinaanibaniin
     1+aagim+Con+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Pret+Pl: nidaagimenyimishinaanibaniig
     1+aagim+Con+Pos+Pej+1Pl+VocPl+Loc: [nidaagimenyimishinaanidig, nidaagimenyimishinaanidog]
     1+aagim+Con+Pos+Pej+1Pl+VocPl+Obv: [nidaagimenyimishinaanidig, nidaagimenyimishinaanidog]
     1+aagim+Con+Pos+Pej+1Pl+VocPl+Pl: [nidaagimenyimishinaanidig, nidaagimenyimishinaanidog]
     1+aagim+Dim+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Pret+Loc: nidaagimensimishinaanibaniing
     1+aagim+Dim+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Pret+Obv: nidaagimensimishinaanibaniin
     1+aagim+Dim+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Pret+Pl: nidaagimensimishinaanibaniig
     1+aagim+Dim+Pos+Pej+1Pl+VocPl+Loc: [nidaagimensimishinaanidig, nidaagimensimishinaanidog]
     1+aagim+Dim+Pos+Pej+1Pl+VocPl+Obv: [nidaagimensimishinaanidig, nidaagimensimishinaanidog]
     1+aagim+Dim+Pos+Pej+1Pl+VocPl+Pl: [nidaagimensimishinaanidig, nidaagimensimishinaanidog]
     2+aagim+Con+Pos+Pej+21+Pret+Loc: gidaagimenyimishinaanibaniing
     2+aagim+Con+Pos+Pej+21+Pret+Obv: gidaagimenyimishinaanibaniin
     2+aagim+Con+Pos+Pej+21+Pret+Pl: gidaagimenyimishinaanibaniig
     2+aagim+Con+Pos+Pej+21+VocPl+Loc: [gidaagimenyimishinaanidig, gidaagimenyimishinaanidog]
     2+aagim+Con+Pos+Pej+21+VocPl+Obv: [gidaagimenyimishinaanidig, gidaagimenyimishinaanidog]
     2+aagim+Con+Pos+Pej+21+VocPl+Pl: [gidaagimenyimishinaanidig, gidaagimenyimishinaanidog]
     2+aagim+Con+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Loc: gidaagimenyimishiwaabaniing
     2+aagim+Con+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Obv: gidaagimenyimishiwaabaniin
     2+aagim+Con+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Pl: gidaagimenyimishiwaabaniig
     2+aagim+Con+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Loc: [gidaagimenyimishiwaadig, gidaagimenyimishiwaadog]
     2+aagim+Con+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Obv: [gidaagimenyimishiwaadig, gidaagimenyimishiwaadog]
     2+aagim+Con+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Pl: [gidaagimenyimishiwaadig, gidaagimenyimishiwaadog]
     2+aagim+Dim+Pos+Pej+21+Pret+Loc: gidaagimensimishinaanibaniing
     2+aagim+Dim+Pos+Pej+21+Pret+Obv: gidaagimensimishinaanibaniin
     2+aagim+Dim+Pos+Pej+21+Pret+Pl: gidaagimensimishinaanibaniig
     2+aagim+Dim+Pos+Pej+21+VocPl+Loc: [gidaagimensimishinaanidig, gidaagimensimishinaanidog]
     2+aagim+Dim+Pos+Pej+21+VocPl+Obv: [gidaagimensimishinaanidig, gidaagimensimishinaanidog]
     2+aagim+Dim+Pos+Pej+21+VocPl+Pl: [gidaagimensimishinaanidig, gidaagimensimishinaanidog]
     2+aagim+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Loc: gidaagimensimishiwaabaniing
     2+aagim+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Obv: gidaagimensimishiwaabaniin
     2+aagim+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Pl: gidaagimensimishiwaabaniig
     2+aagim+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Loc: [gidaagimensimishiwaadig, gidaagimensimishiwaadog]
     2+aagim+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Obv: [gidaagimensimishiwaadig, gidaagimensimishiwaadog]
     2+aagim+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Pl: [gidaagimensimishiwaadig, gidaagimensimishiwaadog]
     3+aagim+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Loc: odaagimenyimishiniibaniing
     3+aagim+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Obv: odaagimenyimishiniibaniin
     3+aagim+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Pl: odaagimenyimishiniibaniig
     3+aagim+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Loc: [odaagimenyimishiniidig, odaagimenyimishiniidog]
     3+aagim+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Obv: [odaagimenyimishiniidig, odaagimenyimishiniidog]
     3+aagim+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Pl: [odaagimenyimishiniidig, odaagimenyimishiniidog]
     3+aagim+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Loc: odaagimenyimishiwaabaniing
     3+aagim+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Obv: odaagimenyimishiwaabaniin
     3+aagim+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Pl: odaagimenyimishiwaabaniig
     3+aagim+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Loc: [odaagimenyimishiwaadig, odaagimenyimishiwaadog]
     3+aagim+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Obv: [odaagimenyimishiwaadig, odaagimenyimishiwaadog]
     3+aagim+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Pl: [odaagimenyimishiwaadig, odaagimenyimishiwaadog]
     3+aagim+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Loc: odaagimensimishiniibaniing
     3+aagim+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Obv: odaagimensimishiniibaniin
     3+aagim+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Pl: odaagimensimishiniibaniig
     3+aagim+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Loc: [odaagimensimishiniidig, odaagimensimishiniidog]
     3+aagim+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Obv: [odaagimensimishiniidig, odaagimensimishiniidog]
     3+aagim+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Pl: [odaagimensimishiniidig, odaagimensimishiniidog]
     3+aagim+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Loc: odaagimensimishiwaabaniing
     3+aagim+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Obv: odaagimensimishiwaabaniin
     3+aagim+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Pl: odaagimensimishiwaabaniig
     3+aagim+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Loc: [odaagimensimishiwaadig, odaagimensimishiwaadog]
     3+aagim+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Obv: [odaagimensimishiwaadig, odaagimensimishiwaadog]
     3+aagim+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Pl: [odaagimensimishiwaadig, odaagimensimishiwaadog]
     
